Washington statutes.
RCW 7.77.140

Confidentiality of collaborative law communication.

Subject to RCW 7.77.110, a collaborative law communication is confidential to the extent agreed by the parties in a signed record or as provided by law of this state other than this chapter.

[ 2013 c 119 s 15.]